Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-1,107.02
Parole Program Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Parole Program Cash Fund is created. All funds collected pursuant to section 83-1,107.01 shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. The fund shall be utilized by the department for the purposes stated in subdivision (20) of section 83-173. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2003, LB 46, § 22;

Laws 2011, LB390, § 26;

Laws 2018, LB841, § 37;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 150.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.